Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7786.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-2-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-2 entitled "General State
Officers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-2-1. General officers enumerated — Election and terms.
The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, and general
treasurer shall be known as general officers. They shall be elected at a general election,
quadrennially, in accordance with the provisions of this title, and shall hold their respective offices
for four (4) years beginning on the first Tuesday of January next succeeding their election and until
the election and qualification of their respective successors. Commencing with the election to be
held in 2030, the secretary of state shall be elected in a non-partisan election, without any party
label, and is not to be nominated or elected as an official representative of a political party.
SECTION 2. Section 17-12-13 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-12 entitled "Party
Committees and Conventions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-12-13. State conventions.
There shall be held not later than October 14 of every even year a state convention for each
political party. The nominees of a party for senator and for representatives in congress, for the five
(5) general offices, and for membership in the general assembly shall be delegates to the state
convention of that party. In presidential election years, these conventions shall select the party
nominees for presidential electors and their names shall be placed on the ballot for the forthcoming

election. Commencing with the election to be held in 2030, the secretary of state shall be elected in
a non-partisan election, without any party label, and is not to be nominated or elected as an official
representative of a political party.
SECTION 3. Section 17-14-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-14 entitled "Nomination
of Party and Independent Candidates" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-14-1. Declarations of candidacy.
During the last consecutive Monday, Tuesday, and Wednesday in June in the even years
and during the thirty-ninth (39th) and fortieth (40th) days preceding a primary election for a special
election for state or local office, or for an election for state or local office regularly scheduled for a
time other than the biennial general statewide election, or during the sixty-seventh (67th) and sixty-
eighth (68th) days preceding a primary election for a special election for federal office, or for an
election for federal office regularly scheduled for a time other than the biennial general statewide
election, each voter desiring to be a candidate at the upcoming primary or an independent candidate
on final nomination papers shall, on a form that shall be provided by the secretary of state, file a
declaration of their candidacy not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. of the last day for the filing
with the secretary of state for congressional and statewide general offices, or with the local board
of the place of the candidate’s voting residence for general assembly, or state committee or
senatorial and representative district committee, or with the appropriate local board for local
officers. The declaration shall be signed by the candidate as the candidate’s name appears on the
voting list. The signature shall be accepted as valid if it can be reasonably identified to be the name
and signature of the voter it purports to be. A variation of the voter’s signature by the insertion or
omission of identifying titles or by the substitution of initials for the first or middle names or both
shall not in itself be grounds for invalidation of the signature. The declaration shall also include the
following information:
(1) The candidate’s name as it appears on the voting list, subject to the same provisions as
relate to the voter’s signature on the declaration;
(2) The address as it appears on the voting list, provided that an address that is substantially
the same as the address on the voting list shall be valid;
(3) The party declaration if seeking to run in a party primary;
(4) The office sought;
(5) The place and date of birth;
(6) The length of residence in the state and in the town or city where the candidate resides;
(7) A certification that the candidate is neither serving a sentence, including probation or
parole, for which the candidate was imprisoned upon final conviction of a felony imposed on any
LC003599 - Page 2 of 5

date nor serving any sentence, whether incarcerated or suspended, on probation or parole, upon
final conviction of a felony committed after November 5, 1986;
(8) A certification that the candidate has not been lawfully adjudicated to be non compos
mentis, of unsound mind;
(9) In the case of candidates for party nomination, a certification that the candidate has not
been a member of a political party other than the declared party within ninety (90) days of the filing
date, except in the case of candidates for party nomination for a special election for federal office,
or for an election for federal office regularly scheduled for a time other than the biennial general
statewide election, that person shall not have been a member of a political party other than the
declared political party within thirty (30) days of the filing of their declaration of candidacy; and
(10) If a person is a candidate for a state or local office, a certification that the person has
not within the preceding three (3) years served any sentence, incarcerated or suspended, on
probation or parole, for a crime committed after November 5, 1986, upon a plea of nolo contendere
or guilty or upon a conviction of a felony or for a misdemeanor for which a sentence of
imprisonment for six (6) months or more, whether suspended or to be served was imposed.; and
(11) Commencing with the election to be held in 2030, the secretary of state shall be elected
in a non-partisan election, without any party label, and is not to be nominated or elected as an
official representative of a political party and shall follow the procedure set forth for independent
candidates set forth herein.
SECTION 4. Section 42-8-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-8 entitled "Department of
State" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-8-1. Head of department — Duties.
(a) There shall be a department of state. The head of the department of state shall be the
secretary of state. The secretary of state shall perform the duties required by this chapter and by
chapter 2 of title 6; chapters 1 to 4, inclusive, of title 7; chapters 16, 19, and 20 of title 17; chapters
3 and 10 of title 22; chapters 1 to 3 and 4, of title 29; chapter 1 of title 36; chapter 7 of title 37;
chapter 30 of this title; chapters 1 and 2 of title 43; chapter 6 of title 44; and any and all other
provisions of the general laws and public laws insofar as such powers and duties relate to the
secretary of state and the department of state.
(b) Commencing with the election to be held in 2030, the attorney general shall be elected
in a non-partisan election, without any party label, and is not to be nominated or elected as an
official representative of a political party.
LC003599 - Page 3 of 5

SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2030.
========
LC003599
========
LC003599 - Page 4 of 5